Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 4 Registered Office, Registered Agents, Service
of Process, and Venue

46-3-240.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each electric membership corporation shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office which may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business; and

A registered agent, which agent may be:

A natural person residing in this state whose business office is identical with such registered office; or

A domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, such domestic or foreign corporation having a business office identical with such registered office.

The Secretary of State shall maintain current records, alphabetically arranged by corporate name, of the address of each electric membership corporation’s registered office and of the name and address of each electric membership corporation’s registered agent.

No registered agent shall be appointed without his or its prior written consent. Such written consent shall be filed with or as part of the document first appointing any registered agent and shall be in such form as the Secretary of State may prescribe.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-401, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-241.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

An electric membership corporation may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, by executing and filing in the office of the Secretary of State a statement setting forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation;

The address of its then registered office;

If the address of its registered office is to be changed, the new address of the registered office;

The name of its then registered agent;

If its registered agent is to be changed, the name of its successor registered agent and the written consent of such successor agent to his appointment; and

That the address of its registered office and the address of the business office of its registered agent, as changed, will be identical.

If the Secretary of State finds that such statement conforms to subsection (a) of this Code section, he shall file such statement in his office; and upon such filing, the change of address of the registered office or the change of the registered agent, or both, as the case may be, shall become effective.

Any registered agent of an electric membership corporation may resign as such agent upon filing a written notice thereof with the Secretary of State. The appointment of such agent shall terminate upon the expiration of 30 days after receipt of such notice by the Secretary of State. There shall be attached to such notice an affidavit of such agent, if an individual, or of an officer thereof, if a corporation, that at least ten days prior to the date of filing such notice a written notice of the agent’s intention to resign was mailed or delivered to the president, secretary, or treasurer of the electric membership corporation for which such agent is acting. Upon such resignation’s becoming effective, the address of the business office of the resigned registered agent shall no longer be the registered office of the electric membership corporation.

A registered agent may change his or its business address and the address of the registered office of any electric membership corporation of which he or it is registered agent to another place within the same county by filing a statement as required in subsection (a) of this Code section, except that such statement need be signed only by the registered agent and need not be responsive to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section and must state that a copy of the statement has been mailed or delivered to a representative of such electric membership corporation other than the notifying registered agent.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-402, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-242.
Service of process on electric membership corporations.

The registered agent appointed by an electric membership corporation pursuant to Code Section 46-3-240 shall be an agent of the electric membership corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the electric membership corporation may be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons and complaint.

Whenever an electric membership corporation fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the Secretary of State shall be an agent of such electric membership corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process, notice, or demand shall be made by delivering to and leaving with him, or with any person having charge of the corporation department of his office, or with any other person or persons designated by the Secretary of State to receive such service, duplicate copies of such process, notice, or demand. In the event any such process, notice, or demand is served on the Secretary of State, he shall immediately cause one of the copies thereof to be forwarded by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, addressed to the electric membership corporation at its registered office or, if there is no registered office, to the last known address of the electric membership corporation or to an officer listed on the most recent annual report filed with the Secretary of State or, if none, to any officer, director, or incorporator of the electric membership corporation as shown by the records of the Secretary of State. Any service so had on the Secretary of State shall be answerable not more than 30 days from the date so mailed by the Secretary of State. The provisions of this subsection may be used notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of Chapter 11 of Title 9, the “Georgia Civil Practice Act.”

The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all processes, notices, and demands served upon him under this Code section and shall record therein the time of such service and his action with reference thereto.

Nothing in this Code section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on an electric membership corporation in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-403, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to subsection (b) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

46-3-243.
Venue in proceedings against electric membership corporations and foreign electric cooperatives generally.

Notwithstanding Code Section 46-1-2, venue in proceedings against an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative shall be determined in accordance with the Constitution of Georgia and this Code section.

Unless otherwise required by the Constitution of Georgia, an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative may be sued only in the county of its residence, as described below:

Each electric membership corporation and each foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be deemed to reside in the county where its registered office is maintained. If any such electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative fails to maintain a registered office, it shall be deemed to reside in the county in this state where its last-named registered office or principal office, as shown by the records of the Secretary of State, was maintained;

Each electric membership corporation and each foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be deemed to reside and may be sued on contracts in the county in which the contract sought to be enforced was made or is to be performed, if it has an office and transacts business in that county;

Each electric membership corporation and each foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall be deemed to reside, and may be sued for damages because of torts, wrong, or injury done, in the county where the cause of action originated, if it has an office and transacts business in that county.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-404, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.